Washington statutes.
RCW 35.61.270

Territorial annexation—Election—Method.

If the park commissioners concur in the petition, they shall cause the proposal to be submitted to the electors of the territory proposed to be annexed, at an election to be held in the territory, which shall be called, canvassed and conducted in accordance with the general election laws. The board of park commissioners by resolution shall fix a time for the holding of the election to determine the question of annexation, and in addition to the notice required by RCW 29A.52.355 shall give notice thereof by causing notice to be published once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the park district, and by posting notices in five public places within the territory proposed to be annexed in the district.

The ballot to be used at the election shall be in the following form:

□ "For annexation to metropolitan park district."

□ "Against annexation to metropolitan park district."

[ 2015 c 53 s 45; 1985 c 469 s 35; 1965 c 7 s 35.61.270. Prior: 1943 c 264 s 20, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6741-20, part; prior: 1907 c 98 s 20, part; RRS s 6739, part.]

NOTES:

Canvassing returns, generally: Chapter 29A.60 RCW.

Conduct of elections—Canvass: RCW 29A.60.010.

Times for holding elections: RCW 29A.04.311 through 29A.04.330.